Utah statutes.
75-7-907.   Language invoking standard of chapter.
The following terms or comparable language in the provisions of a trust,
unless otherwise limited or modified, authorizes any investment or strategy
permitted under this chapter: "investments permissible by law for investment
of trust funds," "legal investments," "authorized investments," "using the
judgment and care under the circumstances then prevailing that persons of
prudence, discretion, and intelligence exercise in the management of their own
affairs, not in regard to speculation but in regard to the permanent
disposition of their funds, considering the probable income as well as the
probable safety of their capital," "prudent man rule," "prudent trustee rule,"
"prudent person rule," and "prudent investor rule."
